Utah statutes.
76-6-506.6.   Financial transaction card offenses -- Unauthorized factoring of credit card sales drafts.

It is unlawful for any person, knowingly, with intent to defraud, acting without the express authorization of the issuer, to employ, solicit, or otherwise cause an authorized credit card merchant, or for the authorized credit card merchant himself, to present any credit card sales draft to the issuer for payment pertaining to any sale or purported sale of goods or services which was not made by the authorized credit card merchant in the ordinary course of business.

